California, session 20252026, SB689.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10010 of the Elections Code is amended to read:10010. (a) A political subdivision that changes from an at-large method of election to a district-based election, or that establishes district-based elections, shall do all of the following before a public hearing at which the governing body of the political subdivision votes to approve or defeat an ordinance establishing district-based elections:(1) Before drawing a draft map or maps of the proposed boundaries of the districts, the political subdivision shall hold at least two public hearings over a period of no more than 30 days, at which the public is invited to provide input regarding the composition of the districts. Before these hearings, the political subdivision may conduct outreach to the public, including to non-English-speaking communities, to explain the districting process and to encourage public participation.(2) After all draft maps are drawn, the political subdivision shall publish and make available for release at least one draft map and, if members of the governing body of the political subdivision will be elected in their districts at different times to provide for staggered terms of office, the potential sequence of the elections. The political subdivision shall also hold at least two additional hearings over a period of no more than 45 days, at which the public is invited to provide input regarding the content of the draft map or maps and the proposed sequence of elections, if applicable. The first version of a draft map shall be published at least seven days before consideration at a hearing. If a draft map is revised at or following a hearing, it shall be published and made available to the public for at least seven days before being adopted.(3) If a public hearing held pursuant to this section is consolidated with a regular or special meeting of the governing body of the political subdivision that includes other substantive agenda items, the public hearing shall begin at a fixed time regardless of its order on the agenda, except that the governing body of the political subdivision may first conclude any item being discussed or acted upon, including any associated public comment, when that time occurs. The governing body shall provide notice of the public hearing to the public.(b) In determining the final sequence of the district elections conducted in a political subdivision in which members of the governing body will be elected at different times to provide for staggered terms of office, the governing body shall give special consideration to the purposes of the California Voting Rights Act of 2001, and it shall take into account the preferences expressed by members of the districts.(c) This section applies to, but is not limited to, a proposal that is required due to a court-imposed change from an at-large method of election to a district-based election.(d) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “At-large method of election” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 14026.(2) “District-based election” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 14026.(3) “Political subdivision” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 14026.(e) (1) (A)Before commencing an action to enforce Sections 14027 and 14028, a prospective plaintiff shall send by certified mail a written notice to the clerk of the political subdivision against which the action would be brought asserting that the political subdivision’s method of conducting elections may violate the California Voting Rights Act of 2001.(B)For allegations that a city with a population of 50,000 people or less has a method of conducting elections that may violate the California Voting Rights Act of 2001, a written notice described in subparagraph (A) shall be signed by at least 100 voters of the city.(2) A prospective plaintiff shall not commence an action to enforce Sections 14027 and 14028 within 90 days of the political subdivision’s receipt of the written notice described in paragraph (1).(3) (A) Before receiving a written notice described in paragraph (1), or within 90 days of receipt of a notice, a political subdivision may pass a resolution outlining its intention to transition from at-large to district-based elections, specific steps it will undertake to facilitate this transition, and an estimated timeframe for doing so.(B) If a political subdivision passes a resolution pursuant to subparagraph (A), a prospective plaintiff shall not commence an action to enforce Sections 14027 and 14028 within 90 days of the resolution’s passage.(C) (i) A political subdivision and the prospective plaintiff who first sends a notice pursuant to paragraph (1) may enter into a written agreement to extend the time period described in subparagraph (B) for up to an additional 90 days in order to provide additional time to conduct public outreach, encourage public participation, and receive public input. The written agreement shall include a requirement that the district boundaries be established no later than six months before the political subdivision’s next regular election to select governing board members. However, in a political subdivision that holds a primary election as part of its process for selecting governing board members, the written agreement shall include a requirement that district boundaries be established no later than six months before the political subdivision’s next regular primary election.(ii) No later than 10 days after a political subdivision enters into a written agreement pursuant to clause (i), the political subdivision shall prepare and make available on its internet website a tentative schedule of the public outreach events and the public hearings held pursuant to this section. If a political subdivision does not maintain an internet website, the political subdivision shall make the tentative schedule available to the public upon request.(f) (1) If a political subdivision adopts an ordinance establishing district-based elections pursuant to subdivision (a), a prospective plaintiff who sent a written notice pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) before the political subdivision passed its resolution of intention may, within 30 days of the ordinance’s adoption, demand reimbursement for the cost of the work product generated to support the notice. A prospective plaintiff shall make the demand in writing and shall substantiate the demand with financial documentation, such as a detailed invoice for demography services. A political subdivision may request additional documentation if the provided documentation is insufficient to corroborate the claimed costs. A political subdivision shall reimburse a prospective plaintiff for reasonable costs claimed, or in an amount to which the parties mutually agree, within 45 days of receiving the written demand for reimbursement, except as provided in paragraph (2). In all cases, the amount of the reimbursement shall not exceed the cap described in paragraph (3).(2) If more than one prospective plaintiff is entitled to reimbursement, the political subdivision shall reimburse the prospective plaintiffs in the order in which they sent a written notice pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), and the 45-day time period described in paragraph (1) applies only to reimbursement of the first prospective plaintiff who sent a written notice pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e). The cumulative amount of reimbursements to all prospective plaintiffs shall not exceed the cap described in paragraph (3).(3) The amount of reimbursement required by this section is capped at thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), as adjusted annually to the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, United States city average, as published by the United States Department of Labor.SEC. 2. Section 14026 of the Elections Code is amended to read:14026. As used in this chapter:(a) “At-large method of election” means any of the following methods of electing members to the governing body of a political subdivision:(1) One in which the voters of the entire jurisdiction elect the members to the governing body.(2) One in which the candidates are required to reside within given areas of the jurisdiction and the voters of the entire jurisdiction elect the members to the governing body.(3) One that combines at-large elections with district-based elections, except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).(b) (1) “District-based elections” means a method of electing members to the governing body of a political subdivision in which the candidate must reside within an election district that is a divisible part of the political subdivision and is elected only by voters residing within that election district.(2) (A) For a city with a population of 50,000 people or less, “district-based elections” includes a method of electing members to the governing body in which no more than 20 percent of the members are elected at large and the remaining members are elected only by voters residing within the election district in which the member resides, provided that the election districts encompass the entire jurisdiction of the city.(B) Subparagraph (A) does not apply if a plaintiff can establish that having 20 percent of the members of the governing body elected at large would prevent the city from drawing district boundaries in a manner that allows a protected class to elect candidates of its choice.(c) “Political subdivision” means a geographic area of representation created for the provision of government services, including, but not limited to, a general law city, general law county, charter city, charter county, charter city and county, school district, community college district, or other district organized pursuant to state law.(d) “Protected class” means a class of voters who are members of a race, color, or language minority group, as this class is referenced and defined in the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.).(e) “Racially polarized voting” means voting in which there is a difference, as defined in case law regarding enforcement of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.), in the choice of candidates or other electoral choices that are preferred by voters in a protected class, and in the choice of candidates and electoral choices that are preferred by voters in the rest of the electorate. The methodologies for estimating group voting behavior as approved in applicable federal cases to enforce the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.) to establish racially polarized voting may be used for purposes of this section to prove that elections are characterized by racially polarized voting.SEC. 3. Section 21160 of the Elections Code is amended to read:21160. (a) The local jurisdiction shall make a good faith effort to encourage residents, including those in underrepresented communities and non-English-speaking communities, to participate in the redistricting process.(b) No later than four weeks before the first hearing or workshop held pursuant to Section 21150, the legislative body or districting body shall adopt a redistricting public education and outreach plan to inform residents about the local jurisdiction’s redistricting process and how to participate. Notwithstanding subdivision (i) of Section 23003, if a local jurisdiction establishes a hybrid redistricting commission to recommend changes to the legislative body’s district boundaries, the public education and outreach plan required by this subdivision shall be adopted by the local jurisdiction, and not by the commission.(1) A draft version of the plan shall be posted online for a 14-day review and comment period prior to being adopted. In developing the draft plan, the local jurisdiction shall make a good faith effort to consult with organizations that are active in the local jurisdiction, including those active in language minority communities, and shall identify those consulted organizations in the draft report.(2) The plan shall include a description of all of the following:(A) How the local jurisdiction will devote the necessary resources on education and outreach to ensure that residents, including residents speaking an applicable language, are informed about the local jurisdiction’s redistricting process.(B) The specific methods the jurisdiction plans to use to inform residents about the redistricting process and how to participate. Examples may include media, including an identification of any media outlets that the jurisdiction plans to use, direct contact with residents, and community events or town halls.(C) How the local jurisdiction will inform organizations that are active in the local jurisdiction, including organizations that requested to be notified of the jurisdiction’s redistricting and organizations active in language minority communities, about the local jurisdiction redistricting process and which of these organizations, if any, that the jurisdiction will partner with to inform the public.(D) Whether and how the local jurisdiction will coordinate its outreach and messaging with other local jurisdictions in the same county that are also redistricting.(E) The number of workshops and public hearings the local jurisdiction intends to hold and their anticipated dates.(3) A jurisdiction may use the redistricting public education and outreach template developed pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 21170 when satisfying the requirements of this subdivision.(c) (1) Throughout the redistricting process, the local jurisdiction shall make a good faith effort to provide redistricting information to all of the following:(1)(A) Media organizations that provide local jurisdiction news coverage, including media organizations that serve language minority communities.(2)(B) Good government, civil rights, civic engagement, neighborhood, and community groups or organizations that are active in the local jurisdiction, including those active in language minority communities.(3)(C) Any person that has requested to be notified concerning the local jurisdiction’s redistricting process. The local jurisdiction shall maintain a contact list for all such persons and provide them with regular updates throughout the redistricting process including, at minimum, notices of upcoming workshops or public hearings.(2) No later than nine months before a local jurisdiction’s first regular election occurring after January 1 in each year ending in the number two, the local jurisdiction shall make the population and demographic data that will be used to adopt its election district boundaries publicly available on its internet website.(d) The local jurisdiction shall arrange for the live translation in an applicable language of a workshop or public hearing held pursuant to this chapter if a request for translation is made at least 72 hours before the workshop or public hearing, unless less than five days’ notice is provided for the workshop or public hearing, in which case the request shall be made at least 48 hours before the workshop or public hearing.(e) Notwithstanding Section 54954.2 of the Government Code, the local jurisdiction shall publish the date, time, and location for any workshop or public hearing on the internet at least five days before the workshop or public hearing. However, if there are fewer than 28 days until the deadline to adopt boundaries, the local jurisdiction may publish the date, time, and location for the workshop or public hearing on the internet for at least 72 hours before the workshop or public hearing.(f) (1) A draft map shall be published on the internet for at least 7 days before being adopted as a final map by the districting body provided that, if there are fewer than 28 days until the deadline to adopt boundaries, the draft map may instead be published on the internet for at least 72 hours.(2) Each draft map prepared by a member of an advisory or hybrid redistricting commission, a member of the districting body, or by employees or contractors of the local jurisdiction, or any draft map submitted by the public that a member of the advisory or hybrid redistricting commission or districting body asks be discussed or considered at a future public hearing, shall be accompanied by information on the total population, citizen voting age population, and racial and ethnic characteristics of the citizen voting age population of each proposed election district, to the extent the local jurisdiction has that data.(3) (A) An advisory or hybrid redistricting commission, the districting body, and employees or contractors of the local jurisdiction shall not release draft maps of election districts earlier than three weeks after the block-level redistricting database required by subdivision (b) of Section 8253 of the Government Code is first made publicly available. This subparagraph does not prohibit the commission or districting body from holding workshops or public hearings on the placement of election district boundaries before the earliest date that draft maps of election districts may be released.(B) If the period of time between the date that the redistricting database is made publicly available and the map adoption deadline is fewer than 90 days and more than 59 days, the waiting period described in subparagraph (A) is reduced to 7 days.(C) If the period of time between the date that the redistricting database is made publicly available and the map adoption deadline is fewer than 60 days, the waiting period described in subparagraph (A) does not apply.(g) (1) The local jurisdiction shall either video or audio record or prepare a written summary of each oral public comment, and each deliberation by a districting body or an advisory or hybrid redistricting commission, made at every workshop or public hearing held pursuant to this chapter. The local jurisdiction shall make the recording or written summary of a workshop or public hearing available to the public on its redistricting web page no later than 14 days after the workshop or public hearing. Notwithstanding subdivision (i) of Section 23003, if a local jurisdiction establishes a hybrid redistricting commission, the local jurisdiction, not the hybrid redistricting commission, shall be responsible for meeting the requirements of this subdivision.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the local jurisdiction shall do both of the following:(A) At least 72 hours before holding the first of its final two workshops or public hearings, make all of the recordings or written summaries of the workshops and public hearings that the local jurisdiction has already held available to the public on its redistricting web page.(B) Make all of the recordings or written summaries of the public hearings required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 21150 available to the public on its redistricting web page at least 72 hours before the first public hearing required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 21150.(h) (1) The districting body, or an advisory or hybrid redistricting commission, shall allow the public to submit written public comment or draft neighborhood, community of interest, or district maps both in a paper format and electronically.(2) The local jurisdiction shall make any written public comments or draft maps available to the public on its redistricting web page no later than 14 days after receiving the public comment or draft map.(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the local jurisdiction shall do both of the following:(A) At least 72 hours before holding the first of its final two workshops or public hearings, make all of the written comments or draft maps available to the public on its redistricting web page, except for any public comment or draft map received less than four business days before that workshop or public hearing.(B) Make all of the written comments or draft maps available to the public on its redistricting web page at least 72 hours before the first public hearing required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 21150, except for any public comment or draft map received less than four business days before that workshop or public hearing.(i) Prior to holding its first workshop or public hearing, the local jurisdiction shall establish, and maintain for at least 10 years after the adoption of new election district boundaries, an accessible internet web page dedicated to redistricting. The web page may be hosted on the local jurisdiction’s existing internet website or another internet website maintained by the local jurisdiction. Prior to the first workshop or public hearing and until new district boundaries are adopted, the homepage of the local jurisdiction’s internet website shall include a prominent link to the redistricting web page. The web page shall include, or link to, all of the following information:(1) A general explanation of the redistricting process for the local jurisdiction. This explanation shall be provided in English and applicable languages.(2) An explanation of the procedures for a member of the public to provide in-person or remote oral public comment during a public hearing or to submit written public comment or a draft map to the districting body, or an advisory or hybrid redistricting commission, either in a paper or electronic format, for consideration at a future public hearing. The explanation shall be provided in English and applicable languages.(3) A calendar of all workshop and public hearing dates. A calendar listing that includes the date, time, and location of the workshop or public hearing dates satisfies the notice required by subdivision (e).(4) A notice of the applicable languages in which the local jurisdiction will provide live translation of a workshop or public hearing upon request and instructions for making such a request. This notice and these instructions shall be provided in English and applicable languages.(5) Instructions and a method for a person to sign up to receive regular notices regarding redistricting, including notices of upcoming workshops or public hearings. These instructions shall be provided in English and applicable languages.(6) The notice and agenda for each workshop and public hearing.(7) The recording or written summary of each workshop and public hearing.(8) Each draft map considered by the districting body or an advisory or hybrid redistricting commission at a public hearing.(9) Each written public comment submitted to the local jurisdiction.(10) The results of the local jurisdiction’s analysis under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 21130.(11) The existing map of election district boundaries prior to redistricting.(12) The adopted final map of election district boundaries after redistricting, and where applicable, the report required pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 21130.(j) This section does not apply when a legislative body transitions from being elected at-large to elected by districts or from districts.(k) Subdivisions (b) to (g), inclusive, paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (h), and paragraphs (4) to (10), inclusive, of subdivision (i) do not apply to special districts or small education districts. Subdivision (i) does not apply to special districts or small education districts that do not have a website for the jurisdiction and are not legally required to establish such a website.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.